Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB58.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1050YC (3) 91 da/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 162.4A, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 162.4A Operation of a research facility ââ certificate of 3 registration. 4 1. A research facility shall only operate pursuant to 5 a certificate of registration issued by the department as 6 provided in section 162.2A . The 7 2. In order to comply with the provisions of this chapter, a 8 research facility shall maintain must do all of the following: 9 a. Maintain records as required by the department in order 10 for the department to ensure the research facilityâs compliance 11 with the provisions of this chapter . A research facility shall 12 not 13 b. Comply with the provisions of chapter 162A. 14 c. Only purchase a dog or cat from a commercial 15 establishment that does not have has been issued or renewed a 16 valid authorization issued or renewed by the department under 17 this chapter or a similar authorization issued or renewed by an 18 authorized entity in another state. 19 Sec. 2. Section 162.10, Code 2025, is amended to read as 20 follows: 21 162.10 Qualified research facilities ââ adoption program. 22 1. As used in this section , unless the context otherwise 23 requires: 24 a. âAnimal rescue organizationâ means a person other than 25 an animal shelter operating on a nonprofit basis to place 26 unwanted, abandoned, abused, or stray dogs or cats in permanent 27 adopted homes as provided by rules adopted by the department. 28 b. (1) âQualified research facilityâ means a research 29 facility, including but not limited to a regents institution, 30 that conducts experiments on dogs or cats for research, 31 education, testing, or another scientific purpose; and that 32 receives moneys from the state or federal government. 33 (2) âQualified research facilityâ includes a research 34 facility that conducts experiments on dogs or cats for 35 -1- LSB 1050YC (3) 91 da/ns 1/ 9 H.F. _____ research, education, testing, or another scientific purpose, 1 in collaboration with a research facility described in 2 subparagraph (1). 3 c. âRetired animalâ means a dog or cat confined at a 4 qualified research facility, if the dog or cat has been 5 previously used for research, education, testing, or another 6 scientific purpose; and the dog or cat is no longer required 7 to be confined by the qualified research facility for any of 8 those purposes. 9 2. 1. A qualified research facility shall establish an 10 adoption program for retired animals confined at the qualified 11 research facility for placement in a permanent adoptive 12 home. In order to be eligible for adoption under the program, 13 the retired animal must not have no a substantial medical 14 condition, and must not pose no a safety risk to the public, 15 that would prevent the dogâs or catâs successful integration 16 into a permanent adoptive home. 17 3. 2. Once a dog or cat becomes a retired animal and is 18 eligible for adoption under the adoption program, the qualified 19 research facility must do at least one of the following: 20 a. Offer to transfer ownership and custody of the retired 21 animal to an animal shelter or animal rescue organization to 22 facilitate the transfer of ownership and custody of the retired 23 animal to a person for placement into the personâs permanent 24 adoptive home. A qualified research facility must enter into 25 an agreement with one or more animal shelters or animal rescue 26 organizations electing to participate in the program. 27 b. Offer to transfer ownership and custody of the retired 28 animal to a person for private placement in the personâs 29 permanent adoptive home according to an arrangement agreed to 30 by the qualified research facility and the person. 31 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 162A.1 Short title. 32 This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the âEthics 33 in Animal Research Actâ . 34 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 162A.2 Definitions. 35 -2- LSB 1050YC (3) 91 da/ns 2/ 9 H.F. _____ As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 1 requires: 2 1. âAnimalâ means a vertebrate animal other than a human. 3 2. â Animal rescue organizationâ means a person, other than 4 an animal shelter, operating on a nonprofit basis to place 5 unwanted, abandoned, abused, or stray dogs or cats in permanent 6 adopted homes as provided by rules adopted by the department. 7 3. a. âAnimal researchâ means the investigation of, or 8 instruction concerning the structure or function of living 9 organisms, and the cause, prevention, control, or cure of 10 diseases, discomfort, impairment, or abnormal conditions 11 affecting human beings or animals. 12 b. âAnimal researchâ does not include subjecting an animal 13 to circumstances for purposes of doing any of the following: 14 (1) Administering a form of recognized veterinary treatment 15 for the purpose of protecting the welfare of the animal, or 16 reducing or eliminating the animalâs suffering or confusion. 17 (2) The conduct of normal animal husbandry practices, 18 including but not limited to an accepted livestock management 19 practice as defined in section 169.3. 20 4. âAnimal research projectâ or âprojectâ means to conduct 21 animal research in order to answer a specific question, to 22 support or refute a hypothesis, or determine the efficacy or 23 likelihood of a scientific result. 24 5. âAnimal shelterâ means the same as defined in section 25 162.2 operating pursuant to a certificate of registration 26 issued by the department pursuant to section 162.4. 27 6. âAnimal Welfare Actâ means the federal Animal Welfare 28 Act, 7 U.S.C. ch. 54, and regulations promulgated by the United 29 States department of agriculture and published in 9 C.F.R. ch. 30 1. 31 7. âBoardâ means the state board of regents. 32 8. âCollege or universityâ means an accredited public or 33 private college or university, including but not limited to 34 a university under the control of the state board of regents 35 -3- LSB 1050YC (3) 91 da/ns 3/ 9 H.F. _____ as provided in chapter 262, or a community college under the 1 jurisdiction of a board of directors for a merged area as 2 provided in chapter 260C. 3 9. âDepartmentâ means the department of agriculture and land 4 stewardship. 5 10. a. âDevocalizationâ means a surgical procedure that 6 changes an animalâs vocal apparatus in a manner that alters, 7 softens, reduces, or eliminates vocal sounds produced by the 8 animal. 9 b. âDevocalizationâ includes a surgical procedure described 10 as ventriculocordectomy or vocal cordectomy that results in 11 cutting, notching, punching, abrading, lasering, or suturing 12 tissue associated with an animalâs vocal chords. 13 11. âMedically necessaryâ means a service performed on any 14 animal that is all of the following: 15 a. Consistent with the symptoms or a diagnosis made in 16 conformance with recommended veterinary practice standards. 17 b. Reasonably calculated to prevent, diagnose, correct, 18 cure, alleviate, or prevent the worsening of a condition that, 19 left untreated, may result in any of the following: 20 (1) The end of life. 21 (2) Pain, suffering, or loss of function. 22 (3) Illness or infirmity. 23 (4) The aggravation of a disability or chronic illness. 24 c. An effective course of treatment for the animal according 25 to recommended veterinary practice. 26 12. a. âQualified research facilityâ means a research 27 facility that is a college or university, if the research 28 facility performs animal research using state moneys. 29 b. âQualified research facilityâ includes any research 30 facility that acts under contract with a qualified research 31 facility. 32 13. âResearch facilityâ means a research facility as defined 33 in section 162.2 that is required to operate pursuant to a 34 certificate of registration issued by the department pursuant 35 -4- LSB 1050YC (3) 91 da/ns 4/ 9 H.F. _____ section 162.4A. 1 14. âRetired animalâ means a dog or cat confined at a 2 qualified research facility, if the dog or cat has been 3 previously used as part of an animal research project and the 4 dog or cat is no longer needed or required to be confined by the 5 qualified research facility. 6 15. âState agencyâ means the same as defined in section 7 8A.101. 8 16. âState moneysâ means moneys appropriated or allocated 9 from the state treasury, including the general fund of the 10 state or other fund, account, or source of revenue controlled 11 by the state, including deposits, transfers, and earnings. 12 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 162A.3 Use of state moneys by 13 qualified research facilities ââ restrictions. 14 1. a. A qualified research facility shall not use state 15 moneys to conduct research that causes an animal pain or 16 distress as described as a category âDâ procedure or âEâ 17 procedure published by the United States department of 18 agriculture, animal and plant health inspection service, under 19 the Animal Welfare Act. 20 b. Paragraph âaâ does not apply to a medically necessary 21 procedure if the animal undergoes a category âDâ procedure 22 described in paragraph âaâ subject to all of the categoryâs 23 required conditions, including the recommended use of an 24 appropriate anesthetic, analgesic, or tranquilizing drug. 25 2. A qualified research facility shall not use state moneys 26 to conduct research involving devocalization. 27 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 162A.4 Use of state moneys by state 28 agencies under contract. 29 1. If a state agency enters into a contract with a private 30 research facility to perform an animal research project, the 31 contract shall specify the amount and percentage of the total 32 cost of performing the project financed by state moneys. 33 2. If the state agency determines that the private research 34 facility performing the animal research has used more state 35 -5- LSB 1050YC (3) 91 da/ns 5/ 9 H.F. _____ moneys than required to perform the project, the private 1 research facility shall not be eligible to enter into another 2 contract with any state agency to perform a project for a 3 twelve-month period. 4 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 162A.5 Animal research report ââ 5 qualified research facilities. 6 1. Not later than March 1 of each year, a qualified research 7 facility shall prepare and publish an animal research report. 8 The qualified research facility shall publish the report on its 9 internet site in a conspicuous location and in a manner that is 10 easily accessible to the public. 11 2. The animal research report must state for the prior 12 calendar year all of the following: 13 a. The total amount of state moneys expended by the 14 qualified research facility to support all animal research 15 projects. 16 b. For each animal research project, the report shall 17 include for the prior calendar year a list of active animal 18 research projects performed by the qualified research facility 19 and financed by state moneys. The report must include for each 20 project all of the following: 21 (1) The title of the project and a brief statement of its 22 purpose. 23 (2) The number and species of animals used. 24 (3) (a) The amount equal to the total cost of performing 25 the project. 26 (b) The amount and percentage of that total cost of 27 performing the project financed by state moneys. 28 (c) The amount and percentage of that total cost of 29 performing the project financed by sources other than state 30 moneys. 31 (4) The expiration date of the project and the expected 32 total amount of state moneys expended on that date. 33 c. The extent to which the qualified research facility 34 has complied with the public health service policy on humane 35 -6- LSB 1050YC (3) 91 da/ns 6/ 9 H.F. _____ care and use of laboratory animals published by the national 1 institutes of health, office of laboratory animal welfare, 2 and the applicable provisions of the Animal Welfare Act. The 3 report must include any corrective action taken in response to 4 a finding of noncompliance. 5 d. (1) The total number of animals used in an animal 6 research project that have been placed for adoption, including 7 animals transferred to animal shelters and animal rescue 8 organizations. 9 (2) The total number of animals used in a project that 10 have died, and a brief statement explaining the cause of 11 death, including why an animal was destroyed and the manner of 12 destruction. 13 (3) A detailed explanation of specific efforts by the 14 facility to reduce the use of animals in research. The 15 explanation must include the number of animals by species used 16 in research each year for the past three calendar years and 17 anticipated numbers expected to be used in the next calendar 18 year. 19 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 162A.6 State animal research report ââ 20 state board of regents. 21 1. Not later than March 1 of each year, the state board 22 of regents shall prepare and submit a state animal research 23 report to the governor and general assembly. The state report 24 shall be a compilation of information in animal research 25 reports submitted to the board by qualified research facilities 26 according to requirements established by rules adopted by the 27 board pursuant to chapter 17A. The board shall publish the 28 state report on its internet site in a conspicuous location and 29 in a manner that is easily accessible to the public. The board 30 shall disseminate information in the state report to interested 31 press organizations. 32 Sec. 9. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. 33 1. The Code editor is directed to transfer section 162.10 34 to section 162A.11. 35 -7- LSB 1050YC (3) 91 da/ns 7/ 9 H.F. _____ 2. The Code editor shall correct internal references in the 1 Code and in any enacted legislation as necessary due to the 2 enactment of this section. 3